Utah statutes.
16-6a-809.   Removal of directors by judicial proceeding.

(1) (a)  The applicable court may remove a director in a proceeding commenced either by the nonprofit corporation or by voting members holding at least 10% of the votes entitled to be cast in the election of the director's successor if the court finds that:

(i)  the director engaged in:

(A)  fraudulent or dishonest conduct; or

(B)  gross abuse of authority or discretion with respect to the nonprofit corporation; or

(ii) (A)  a final judgment has been entered finding that the director has violated a duty set forth in Section 16-6a-822; and

(B)  removal is in the best interests of the nonprofit corporation.

(b)  For purposes of this Subsection (1), the applicable court is the:

(i)  district court of the county in this state where a nonprofit corporation's principal office is located; or

(ii)  if the nonprofit corporation has no principal office in this state:

(A)  the district court of the county in which its registered office is located; or

(B)  if the nonprofit corporation has no registered office, the district court for Salt Lake County.

(2)  The court that removes a director may bar the director for a period prescribed by the court from:

(a)  reelection;

(b)  reappointment; or

(c)  designation.

(3)  If voting members commence a proceeding under Subsection (1), the voting members shall make the nonprofit corporation a party defendant.

(4)  A director who is removed pursuant to this section may deliver to the division for filing a statement to that effect pursuant to Section 16-6a-1608.

